Missouri, session 2026, SB914.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 701.040 and 701.046, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 701.040 and 701.046, to read as follows:
701.040. [1.] The department of health and senior
services shall:
(1) Develop by September 1, 1995, a state standard for
the location, size of sewage tanks and length of lateral
lines based on the [percolation or permeability rate of the]
soil properties, construction, installation, and operation
of on-site sewage disposal systems. Advice from the
department of natural resources shall be considered. City
or county governments may adopt, by order or ordinance, the
state standard in accordance with the provisions of sections
701.025 to 701.059. In any jurisdiction where a city or
county has not adopted the state standard, the department of
health and senior services shall enforce the state standard
until such time as the city or county adopts the standard;
(2) Define by rule a list of [those persons who are
qualified to perform the percolation tests or] on-site soil
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SB 914 2
evaluators registered by the department to conduct soils
morphology [tests] evaluations required by the state
standard. The list shall include the following:
(a) Persons trained and certified by either the
department, which shall include on-site sewage disposal
system contractors or a certified agent of the department;
(b) Licensed professional engineers as defined in
section 327.011;
(c) Sanitarians meeting standards defined by the
department;
(d) Qualified geologists as defined in section
[256.501] 256.453; and
(e) "Soil scientists", defined as a person that has
successfully completed at least fifteen semester credit
hours of soils science course work, including at least three
hours of course work in soil morphology and interpretations;
(3) Develop in accordance with sections 701.053 to
701.055 a voluntary registration program for on-site sewage
disposal system contractors. Approved county programs shall
implement the contractor registration program. In any area
where a county has not adopted, by order or ordinance, the
contractor registration program, the department shall
implement the program until such time as the county adopts
the registration program;
(4) Establish an education training program
specifically developed for contractors and city and county
employees. [Contractors may be taught and allowed to
perform percolation tests.] Reasonable fees may be charged
of the participants to cover the cost of the training and
shall be deposited in the public health services fund
created in section 192.900. The department shall provide,
as a part of the education training program, an installation

SS SB 914 3
manual for on-site sewage disposal systems. The manual
shall also be made available, at the cost of publication and
distribution, to persons not participating in the education
and training program;
(5) [Periodically review, but not more than annually,
any county's or city's ordinance or order and enforcement
record to assure that the state standard is being
consistently and appropriately enforced. In its review the
department shall assess the timeliness of the county's or
city's inspections of on-site sewage systems, and county or
city enforcement may be terminated if the department
determines that the county or city is unable to provide
prompt inspections. If the department determines that the
standard is not being consistently or appropriately enforced
in any city or county, the department shall notify the
county or city of the department's intent to enforce the
standard in that jurisdiction and after thirty days' notice
hold a public hearing in such county or city to make a
determination as to whether the state shall enforce the
state standard. Any city or county aggrieved by a decision
of the department may appeal a decision of the department to
the state board of health and senior services established
under section 191.400. Any city or county aggrieved by a
decision of the state board of health and senior services
may appeal that decision to the administrative hearing
commission in the manner provided in section 621.120]
Administer, pursuant to sections 701.025 to 701.059, a
mandatory registration program requiring continuing
education before January 1, 2027, for on-site wastewater
treatment system professionals qualified to perform
percolation tests in accordance with the standards
promulgated under subdivision (1) of this section. Before

SS SB 914 4
January 1, 2027, if a soil morphology evaluation cannot be
reasonably obtained, a percolation test may be accepted at
the discretion of the administrative authority. The
provisions of this subdivision shall be void and of no
effect after December 31, 2026; and
(6) Promulgate such rules and regulations as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 701.025 to
701.059.
[2. Subdivision (5) of this section shall be void and
of no effect after January 1, 1998.]
701.046. Except as otherwise provided in section
701.031, no person may, on or after September 1, 1995,
construct or make a major modification or major repair to an
on-site sewage disposal system without first notifying the
city, county or department and completing an application,
upon a form provided by the department, [and] submitting [a]
an application fee in the amount established by the city,
county or department, and obtaining a construction permit.
[The fee shall be set at an amount no greater than that
necessary to cover the cost to implement the state standard
for on-site sewage disposal systems and the registration of
contractors.] For areas of the state where the department
is enforcing the state standard or registering contractors,
the department shall [establish the fee, by rule, at an
amount not greater than ninety dollars. The department may
charge an additional fee, as necessary, to cover the
expenses of training those contractors electing to perform
the percolation tests] promulgate regulations establishing
the conditions and requirements for the construction permit
application, including the collection of reasonable fees.
The fees shall be set at a level to produce revenue that
shall not exceed the cost and expense of administering the

SS SB 914 5
provisions of sections 701.025 to 701.059. The application
form shall require such information necessary to show that
the on-site sewage disposal system will comply with the
state standard. Such fees, when collected by the
department, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the Missouri public health services fund. The
department shall provide technical assistance regarding the
type and location of the system to be installed when
processing applications received under sections 701.046 to
701.048 and 701.050. Fees collected by the department shall
be deposited in the Missouri public health services fund
created in section 192.900 and shall be used to implement
sections 701.025 to 701.059 and for no other purpose.
✓